North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-29 State Bonds, General Provisions

54-29-01.
State bonds — Where payable.

All state bonds issued under the provisions of this title are payable at a place or places specified in the resolution or other related documents of the industrial commission.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 293, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 2284a1; R.C. 1943, § 54-2901; 1989, ch. 651, § 1.

Collateral References.

Power of state to issue bonds as implying power to refund them, 1 A.L.R.2d 134.

54-29-02.
When state bonds may be canceled and destroyed.

Any bonds issued by the state and the interest coupons accompanying them, if any, must be canceled and destroyed according to the provisions of the resolution or other related documents of the industrial commission.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 289, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 2284a2; R.C. 1943, § 54-2902; S.L. 1983, ch. 566, § 1; 1989, ch. 651, § 2.

54-29-03.
Filing of certificate showing destruction.

Within thirty days after the destruction of bonds issued by the state and the coupons accompanying them, if any, there must be filed in the office of the industrial commission, there to be kept on file with the resolution or other related documents to which it refers, a certificate, executed by the person or persons responsible for the destruction, showing the destruction of such bonds and coupons, if any, to have been done and performed in accordance with the terms of the resolution or other related documents of the industrial commission.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 289, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 2284a2; R.C. 1943, § 54-2903; S.L. 1983, ch. 566, § 2; 1989, ch. 651, § 3.

54-29-04.
Reissuance of bonds when canceled and destroyed. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 651, § 4.

54-29-05.
Issuance of coupon bond — Authorizing exchange. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 651, § 4.